Utah statutes.
57-8-6.   Ownership and possession rights.
Each unit owner shall be entitled to the exclusive ownership and possession of
his unit. The owner of a time period condominium unit shall be entitled to the
exclusive ownership and possession of the physical unit to which his time
period relates and shall be entitled to the use and enjoyment of the common
areas and facilities during, but only during, such annually recurring part or
parts of a year as describe and define the time period unit concerned in the
declaration.
